Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2086YH (2) 91 ll/jh H.F. 745 Section 1. Section 414.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. For the purpose of promoting the 3 general welfare of the community, a city is hereby empowered to 4 regulate the use of a building for single-family residential 5 purposes by prohibiting the purchase of single-family 6 residential property by corporations or other business entities 7 utilizing private equity funds, hedge funds, or real estate 8 funds for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 9 30, 2030. 10 b. This subsection is repealed July 1, 2030. 11